public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.old.verb.rules.aff
# vèrbi -<is>ír
# themeT1 + ir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2
SFX d0 Y 237
SFX d0 ir arane/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir aratu/I3 ir	
SFX d0 ir arave/P3 ir	
SFX d0 ir aremo/P0I0 ir
SFX d0 ir aren/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir arene/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir arense ir
SFX d0 ir arensi ir
SFX d0 ir aresi/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir aresiu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir arion/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir arione/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir arionse ir
SFX d0 ir arisen/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir arisene/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir arisense ir
SFX d0 ir arisensi ir
SFX d0 ir arisi/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir arision/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir arisione/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir arisionse ir
SFX d0 ir arisiu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir arisié/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir arisiéu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir arison/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir arisone/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir arisonse ir
SFX d0 ir arié/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir ariéu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir aron/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir arone/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir aronse ir
SFX d0 ir arà/P3I0I2 ir
SFX d0 ir aràe/P3 ir	
SFX d0 ir aràvene/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir arè/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir arène/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir aré/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir arémoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir arémome/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir arémomene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir arésimo/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir arésimoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir arésitu/I3 ir	
SFX d0 ir aréu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir aría/I0I2 ir
SFX d0 ir arèe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX d0 ir aríane/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir aríatu/I3 ir	
SFX d0 ir aríe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX d0 ir aríene/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir arísitu/I3 ir	
SFX d0 ir arò/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir aròe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir erane/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir eratu/I3 ir	
SFX d0 ir erave/P3 ir	
SFX d0 ir eremo/P0I0 ir
SFX d0 ir eren/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir erene/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir erense ir
SFX d0 ir erensi ir
SFX d0 ir eresi/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir eresiu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir erion/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir erione/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir erionse ir
SFX d0 ir erisen/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir erisene/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir erisense ir
SFX d0 ir erisensi ir
SFX d0 ir erisi/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir erision/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir erisione/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir erisionse ir
SFX d0 ir erisiu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir erisié/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir erisiéu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir erison/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir erisone/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir erisonse ir
SFX d0 ir erié/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir eriéu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir eron/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir erone/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir eronse ir
SFX d0 ir erà/P3I0I2 ir
SFX d0 ir eràe/P3 ir	
SFX d0 ir eràvene/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir erè/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir erène/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir eré/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir erémoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir erémome/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir erémomene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir erésimo/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir erésimoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir erésitu/I3 ir	
SFX d0 ir eréu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir ería/I0I2 ir
SFX d0 ir erèe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX d0 ir eríane/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir eríatu/I3 ir	
SFX d0 ir eríe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX d0 ir eríene/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir erísitu/I3 ir	
SFX d0 ir erò/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir eròe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir onme/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir éa/P3I0I4 ir
SFX d0 ir éane/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir éau/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir ée/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir éene/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir éi/I0I2I4 ir
SFX d0 ir éimo/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir éimoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir éitu/I3 ir	
SFX d0 ir éndome/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir éndomene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir éntome/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir éntomene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir éo/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir éone/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir ésimo ir
SFX d0 ir évane/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir évau/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir évene/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir évimoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir évitu/I3 ir	
SFX d0 ir évone/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir í/P3I4 ir
SFX d0 ir ía/P3I0I4 ir
SFX d0 ir èe/P3I0I4 ir
SFX d0 ir íane/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir íau/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir íe/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir íene/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir íi/I0I2I4 ir
SFX d0 ir íimo/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir íimoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir íitu/I3 ir	
SFX d0 ir ímoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir índome/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir índomene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir íntome/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir íntomene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ío/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir íone/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir ísai ir
SFX d0 ir ísame/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ísamene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ísane/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir ísei ir
SFX d0 ir íseme/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ísemene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ísene/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir ísime/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ísimene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ísimo ir
SFX d0 ir ísine/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir ísitu/I3 ir	
SFX d0 ir ísoe/M0 ir
SFX d0 ir ísome/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ísomene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ísone/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir íu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir ívane/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir ívau/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir ívene/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir ívimoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir ívitu/I3 ir	
SFX d0 ir ívone/I1 ir	
SFX d0 ir ónmene/P6 ir
SFX d0 r mo/P0I0 ir
SFX d0 r nsi ir	 
SFX d0 r onme/P6 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX d0 r sa/P0 ir
SFX d0 r sede/I4 ir
SFX d0 r sege/I4 ir
SFX d0 r siu/I5 ir
SFX d0 r so/P0I0 ir
SFX d0 r sé/I4 ir
SFX d0 r séu/I5 ir
SFX d0 r vene/I1 ir	
SFX d0 r vione/I1 ir	
SFX d0 r viéu/I5 ir
SFX d0 r vone/I1 ir	
SFX d0 r éu/I5 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX d0 r ónmene/P6 [^cijɉñ]ir

# vèrbi -<is>ír
# themeT1 + ir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2
SFX d1 Y 68
SFX d1 ir aralo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir arave-lo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir aremo/P1 ir
SFX d1 ir arà-lo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir aràe-lo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir aràelo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir aràvelo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir arémolo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir arémomelo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir aríe-lo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir aríelo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir aríselo/I8 ir
SFX d1 ir elo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir eralo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir erave-lo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir eremo/P1 ir
SFX d1 ir erà-lo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir eràe-lo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir eràelo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir eràvelo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir erémolo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir erémomelo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir eríe-lo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir eríelo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir eríselo/I8 ir
SFX d1 ir es ir
SFX d1 ir est ir
SFX d1 ir eve-lo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir é-lo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir ée-lo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir éelo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir éndolo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir éndomelo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir éntolo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir éntomelo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir évelo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir íe-lo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir íelo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir índolo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir índomelo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir íntolo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir íntomelo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir ísalo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir ísamelo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir íselo/A1 ir
SFX d1 ir íselo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir ísemelo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir ísilo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir ísimelo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir ísolo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir ísomelo/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir onme/P7 ir
SFX d1 ir ónmelo/P7 ir
SFX d1 r s ir
SFX d1 r t ir
SFX d1 r mo/P1 ir
SFX d1 r sa/P1 ir
SFX d1 r se-lo/A1 ir
SFX d1 r so/P1 ir
SFX d1 r onme/P7 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX d1 r ónmelo/P7 [^cijɉñ]ir

# vèrbi -<is>ír
# themeT1 + ir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2
SFX d2 Y 62
SFX d2 ir arave-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir araƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir aremo/P2 ir
SFX d2 ir arà-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir aràe-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir aràeƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir aràveƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir arémomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir arémoƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir aríe-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir aríeƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir aríseƚo/I9 ir
SFX d2 ir erave-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir eraƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir eremo/P2 ir
SFX d2 ir erà-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir eràe-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir eràeƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir eràveƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir erémomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir erémoƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir eríe-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir eríeƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir eríseƚo/I9 ir
SFX d2 ir eve-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir eƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir é-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir ée-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir éeƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir éndomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir éndoƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir éntomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir éntoƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir éveƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir íe-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir íeƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir índomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir índoƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir íntomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir íntoƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir ísameƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir ísaƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir ísemeƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir íseƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 ir íseƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir ísimeƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir ísiƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir ísomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir ísoƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 ir ónmeƚo/P8 ir
SFX d2 r mo/P2 ir
SFX d2 r sa/P2 ir
SFX d2 r se-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX d2 r so/P2 ir
SFX d2 r ónmeƚo/P8 [^cijɉñ]ir


# vèrbi -ír
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2
# themeT8 + o/e0e1e2P0P1P2I0
SFX e0 Y 224
SFX e0 io i/P0P3I2 io
SFX e0 ir arane/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir aratu/I3 ir	
SFX e0 ir arave/P3 ir	
SFX e0 ir aremo/P0I0 ir
SFX e0 ir aren/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir arene/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir arense ir
SFX e0 ir arensi ir
SFX e0 ir aresi/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir aresiu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir arion/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir arione/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir arionse ir
SFX e0 ir arisen/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir arisene/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir arisense ir
SFX e0 ir arisensi ir
SFX e0 ir arisi/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir arision/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir arisione/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir arisionse ir
SFX e0 ir arisiu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir arisié/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir arisiéu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir arison/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir arisone/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir arisonse ir
SFX e0 ir arié/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir ariéu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir aron/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir arone/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir aronse ir
SFX e0 ir arà/P3I0I2 ir
SFX e0 ir aràe/P3 ir	
SFX e0 ir aràvene/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir arè/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir arène/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir aré/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir arémoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir arémome/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir arémomene/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir arésimo/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir arésimoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir arésitu/I3 ir	
SFX e0 ir aréu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir aría/I0I2 ir
SFX e0 ir arèe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX e0 ir aríane/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir aríatu/I3 ir	
SFX e0 ir aríe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX e0 ir aríene/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir arísitu/I3 ir	
SFX e0 ir arò/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir aròe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir ede/I4 ir	
SFX e0 ir ege/I4 ir	
SFX e0 ir erane/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir eratu/I3 ir	
SFX e0 ir erave/P3 ir	
SFX e0 ir eremo/P0I0 ir
SFX e0 ir eren/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir erene/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir erense ir
SFX e0 ir erensi ir
SFX e0 ir eresi/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir eresiu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir erion/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir erione/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir erionse ir
SFX e0 ir erisen/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir erisene/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir erisense ir
SFX e0 ir erisensi ir
SFX e0 ir erisi/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir erision/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir erisione/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir erisionse ir
SFX e0 ir erisiu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir erisié/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir erisiéu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir erison/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir erisone/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir erisonse ir
SFX e0 ir erié/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir eriéu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir eron/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir erone/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir eronse ir
SFX e0 ir erà/P3I0I2 ir
SFX e0 ir eràe/P3 ir	
SFX e0 ir eràvene/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir erè/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir erène/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir eré/I4 ir
SFX e0 ir erémoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir erémome/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir erémomene/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir erésimo/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir erésimoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir erésitu/I3 ir	
SFX e0 ir eréu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir ería/I0I2 ir
SFX e0 ir erèe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX e0 ir eríane/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir eríatu/I3 ir	
SFX e0 ir eríe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX e0 ir eríene/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir erísitu/I3 ir	
SFX e0 ir erò/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir eròe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir onme/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir éa/P3I0I4 ir
SFX e0 ir éane/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir éau/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir ée/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir éene/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir éi/I0I2I4 ir
SFX e0 ir éimo/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir éimoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir éitu/I3 ir	
SFX e0 ir éndome/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir éndomene/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir éntome/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir éntomene/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir éo/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir éone/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir ésimo ir
SFX e0 ir éu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir évane/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir évau/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir évene/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir évimoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir évitu/I3 ir	
SFX e0 ir évone/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir í/P3I4 ir
SFX e0 ir ía/P3I0I2I4 ir
SFX e0 ir èe/P3I0I2I4 ir
SFX e0 ir íane/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir íau/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir íe/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir íene/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir íi/I0I2I4 ir
SFX e0 ir íimo/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir íimoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir íitu/I3 ir	
SFX e0 ir ímoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir índome/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir índomene/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir íntome/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir íntomene/P6 ir
SFX e0 ir ío/I0 ir
SFX e0 ir íone/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir ísimo ir
SFX e0 ir ísitu/I3 ir	
SFX e0 ir íu/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir ívane/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir ívau/I5 ir
SFX e0 ir ívene/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir ívimoe/I1 ir
SFX e0 ir ívitu/I3 ir	
SFX e0 ir ívone/I1 ir	
SFX e0 ir ónmene/P6 ir
SFX e0 o a/P0 o
SFX e0 o e/P0P3I0 [^lr]o
SFX e0 o e/P0P3I0 [aeiouàèéíòóú][lr]o
SFX e0 o e/P0P3I0 [^aeiouàèéíòóú][lr]o
SFX e0 o i/P0P3I2 [^i]o
SFX e0 r ge ir
SFX e0 r me/P6 ir
SFX e0 r mo/P0I0 ir
SFX e0 r nsi ir	 
SFX e0 r onme/P6 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e0 r vene/I1 ir	
SFX e0 r vione/I1 ir	
SFX e0 r viéu/I5 ir
SFX e0 r vone/I1 ir	
SFX e0 r éu/I5 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e0 r ónmene/P6 [^cijɉñ]ir
